Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska26-202
No-contact period; prohibitions.

Unless the victim has provided a waiver under section 26-203, when a person is arrested for a domestic assault offense or sexual assault offense, the person shall, for the duration of the no-contact period:

(1) Not contact the victim;

(2) Avoid the residence of the victim and, if applicable, any premises temporarily occupied by the victim; and

(3) Avoid causing any person, other than law enforcement officers and attorneys for the arrested person and victim, to contact the victim.

Laws 2026, LB935, § 27.
January 1, 2027